Hawaii statutes.
§832-16 Bail; in what cases; conditions of
bond. Unless the offense with which the prisoner is charged is shown to be
an offense punishable by death or life imprisonment under the laws of the state
in which it was committed, a judge in this State may admit the person arrested
to bail by bond, with sufficient sureties, and in such sum as the judge deems
proper, conditioned for the person's appearance before the judge at a time
specified in the bond, and for the person's surrender, to be arrested upon the warrant
of the governor of this State. [L 1941, c 99, §16; RL 1945, §10646; RL 1955,
§250-16; HRS §713-16; am L 1970, c 188, §39; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next